Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-522
Fires; failure of city or county authorities to investigate and report; penalty.

Any officer referred to in section 81-506 who neglects to comply with any of the requirements of sections 81-501.01 to 81-531 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 21, p. 488;

C.S.1929, § 81-5521;

R.S.1943, § 81-522;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 289.